Wyoming statutes. Title 4 Trusts
Article 5. Creditor's Claims; Spendthrift and Discretionary Trusts
§ 4-10-523.
Qualified transfer affidavit.

A qualified transfer affidavit shall be in writing, sworn to by the settlor, and shall include each of the following statements:

The settlor has full right, title and authority to transfer the property to the qualified spendthrift trust;

The transfer of the property to the qualified spendthrift trust will not render the settlor insolvent;

The settlor does not intend to defraud any creditors by transferring the property to the qualified spendthrift trust;

The settlor does not have any pending or threatened court actions against him, except for those court actions identified in the affidavit;

The settlor is not involved in any administrative proceedings, except for those administrative proceedings identified in the affidavit;

At the time of the transfer of the property to the qualified spendthrift trust, the settlor is not in default of a child support obligation by more than thirty (30) days;

The settlor does not contemplate the filing for relief under the provisions of the federal Bankruptcy Code;

The property transferred to the qualified spendthrift trust was not derived from any unlawful activities;

The settlor has and shall maintain personal liability insurance of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) or shall provide coverage equal to the fair market value of the settlor’s total qualified transfers to qualified spendthrift trusts, whichever is less. This affidavit requirement shall not apply to a qualified transfer to a trust created by a court order under W.S.

3-3-607

or an irrevocable income trust created under W.S. 42-2-403(f)(ii) and 42 U.S.C. 1396p(d)(4)(B).

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 155, § 1; 2008, ch. 80, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “or an irrevocable income trust created under W.S. 42-2-403(f)(ii) and 42 U.S.C. 1396p(d)(4)(B)” at the end of (a)(ix).

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “include each of the following statements” for “state that” in the introductory language of (a) and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 155, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.